Nevada, session 83, AB100.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*AB100_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 2. Chapter 494 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 to 13, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 3. As used in sections 3 to 13, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 4, 5 and 6 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 4. “Air carrier” means a person who provides
commercial air transportation to passengers. The term includes,
without limitation, an air taxi operator designated pursuant to 14
C.F.R. § 298.3.
Sec. 5. “Director” means the Director of the Office of
Aerospace appointed pursuant to section 7 of this act.
Sec. 6. “Office” means the Office of Aerospace created by
section 7 of this act.
Sec. 7. 1. The Office of Aerospace is hereby created within
the Department of Transportation.
2. The Governor shall appoint a Director to head the Office.
The Director is in the unclassified service of the State and serves
at the pleasure of the Governor.
Sec. 8. 1. The Office shall:
(a) Develop a statewide plan for advanced air mobility airspace
and airport infrastructure and aviation-flight use, including,
without limitation, airport, airstrip, heliport, spaceport and
vertiport, which must be developed with input from relevant
stakeholders;
(b) Manage and support the development of air service in this
State, with an emphasis on intrastate air service to all areas of this
State;
(c) Expand existing state planning for airports and heliport
systems to highlight the economic impact of airports and aviation
in this State;
(d) Create a system for automated weather observation at rural
locations;
(e) Create a certification program in airport lighting and
maintenance at rural airports;
(f) Develop a program to distribute surplus equipment to
airports in this State;
(g) Implement a statewide network of crew cars to support
rural airports in this State; and
(h) Establish a comprehensive aviation support network in this
State.
2. The Director may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of sections 3 to 13, inclusive, of this act.
-
*AB100_R1*

– 4 –
Sec. 9. The Office of Aerospace may apply for any available
grants and accept gifts, grants, bequests and other contributions
from any public or private source, including interlocal
agreements.
Sec. 10. 1. There is hereby created as a special revenue
fund in the State Treasury the Nevada Aerospace Development
Fund. Any money in the Fund remaining at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Fund must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
2. The Director shall administer the Fund. The Director may
accept gifts, bequests, grants, appropriations and donations from
any source for deposit in the Fund.
3. The money in the Fund must be invested as other state
funds are invested. All interest earned on the deposit or investment
of the money in the Fund, after deducting any applicable charges,
must be credited to the Fund. Claims against the Fund must be
paid as other claims against the State are paid.
4. The Director may make grants of money from the Fund to
air carriers or governmental entities that satisfy the criteria set
forth in section 11 of this act.
Sec. 11. 1. The Office shall develop a program to provide
grants of money from the Nevada Aerospace Development Fund
created by section 10 of this act to an air carrier or governmental
entity for the purpose of establishing air service or providing
enhanced air service routes that service a public-use airport that is
a National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems public airport.
2. An application for a grant of money from the Fund must
be in the form prescribed by the Director and must include,
without limitation:
(a) A statement designating the airport described in subsection
1 for which the air carrier will commence or continue air service if
the grant is awarded;
(b) Commitments from the air carrier that if the Office awards
the grant to the air carrier, the air carrier will enter into a written
agreement with the Office that provides for the air carrier to
commence or continue air service to the airport designated in the
application in exchange for receiving from the Office one of the
guarantees set forth in subsection 4; and
(c) Letters of support from each airport that participates in the
air service route offered by the air carrier pursuant to
subsection 1.
3. The Office may make a grant of money from the Nevada
Aerospace Development Fund if the Office finds that the grant
will:
-
*AB100_R1*

– 5 –
(a) Enable an air carrier to commence or continue air service
to an airport described in subsection 1; and
(b) Provide economic benefit to this State.
4. The Office may make a grant of money from the Nevada
Aerospace Development Fund only to:
(a) Guarantee that an air carrier will receive an agreed
amount of revenue per flight that the air carrier operates into or
out of the airport designated in the application pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 2; or
(b) Guarantee a profit goal for the air carrier that is
established by agreement between the air carrier and the Office.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems public
airport” means an airport in this State that is part of the most
recent version of the National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems
published by the United States Secretary of Transportation
pursuant to 49 U.S.C. § 47103.
(b) “Public-use airport” has the meaning ascribed to it in 49
U.S.C. § 47102.
Sec. 12. 1. The Nevada Aerospace Commission is hereby
created within the Office. The Commission shall advise the
Governor and the Office on the priorities for aerospace
development in this State.
2. The Commission consists of:
(a) The Director;
(b) One member appointed by the Governor who is a member
of the Commission on Tourism;
(c) One member appointed by the Governor who represents the
Nevada Aviation Association or its successor organization;
(d) One member appointed by the Governor who represents the
department of aviation in a county whose population is 700,000 or
more;
(e) One member appointed by the Governor who represents the
Reno-Tahoe Airport Authority;
(f) One member appointed by the Governor who represents the
Nevada Resort Association or its successor organization;
(g) One member appointed by the Governor who represents the
Nevada Association of Counties or its successor organization; and
(h) One member appointed by the Governor who represents
the Nevada League of Cities or its successor organization.
3. The Governor shall ensure that at least one member
appointed pursuant to subsection 2 is a resident of a county whose
population is less than 100,000.
-
*AB100_R1*

– 6 –
4. The terms of office for the members of the Commission
appointed pursuant to paragraphs (b) to (h), inclusive, of
subsection 2 are 2 years, which terms must be staggered.
5. At the first meeting of each fiscal year, the Commission
shall elect from among its members a Chair, a Vice Chair and a
Secretary.
6. The Commission shall meet at least once each calendar
quarter and at other times at the call of the Chair or a majority of
its members. A majority of the members of the Commission
constitutes a quorum for the transaction of all business.
7. The members of the Commission serve without
compensation.
Sec. 13. On or before February 1 of each year, the Office
shall prepare and submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature, or if the Legislature is
not in session, the Legislative Commission, a report detailing for
the immediately preceding calendar year:
1. The total number of applications for grants of money from
the Nevada Aerospace Development Fund created by section 10 of
this act that were received pursuant to section 11 of this act;
2. The total amount of grants from the Nevada Aerospace
Development Fund that were awarded by the Office to air carriers
or governmental entities pursuant to section 11 of this act;
3. For each grant of money awarded from the Nevada
Aerospace Development Fund, the amount of each grant and an
explanation of how the grant will be used by the air carrier to
provide or enhance air service to an airport;
4. The total amount of grants from the Fund for Aviation that
were awarded by the Office to a county, city or other local
government pursuant to NRS 494.048; and
5. For each grant of money awarded from the Fund for
Aviation that was awarded by the Office to a county, city or local
government pursuant to NRS 494.048, the amount of each grant
and an explanation of how the grant will be used by the county,
city or other local government.
Sec. 14. NRS 494.048 is hereby amended to read as follows:
494.048 1. The Fund for Aviation is hereby created as a trust
fund in the State Treasury. The Director:
(a) Shall administer the Fund; and
(b) May apply for and accept any gift, bequest, grant,
appropriation or donation from any source for deposit in the Fund.
2. Any money received by the Director pursuant to the
provisions of subsection 1 must be deposited in the Fund. The
money in the Fund may be invested as the money in other state
funds is invested. After deducting any applicable charges, all
-
*AB100_R1*

– 7 –
interest and income earned on the money in the Fund must be
credited to the Fund. The money in the Fund may be expended only
in accordance with the terms and conditions of any gift, bequest,
grant, appropriation or donation to the Fund or in the manner
provided in subsection 3. Not more than 1 percent of the money in
the Fund may be used to pay the costs of administering the Fund.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Director
may:
(a) Expend money in the Fund to award grants to a county, city
or other local government in this State for obtaining matching
money for federal programs and any other programs relating to
airports or for the planning, establishment, development,
construction, enlargement, improvement or maintenance of any
airport, landing area or air navigation facility owned or controlled
by the county, city or other local government; and
(b) Adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of
paragraph (a).
4. The Director shall:
(a) In adopting regulations pursuant to subsection 3, determine
the order of priority for the expenditures from the Fund by
considering, without limitation, the following factors:
(1) The purpose of the project;
(2) The costs and benefits of the project; and
(3) The effect of the project on the environment, safety,
security, infrastructure and capacity of the airport; and
(b) Before awarding a grant or adopting a regulation pursuant to
subsection 3, consult with the Nevada Aviation Technical Advisory
Committee and any person who represents an airport in this State
used by the general public.
5. Any money received by a county, city or other local
government pursuant to the provisions of this section must be
accounted for separately by the county, city or other local
government and may be used only for the purpose for which the
money was received by the county, city or other local government.
6. The provisions of this section do not apply to an airport,
landing area or air navigation facility that is owned or controlled by
the Reno-Tahoe Airport Authority or a county whose population is
700,000 or more.
7. As used in this section, “Director” means the Director of the
[Department] Office of [Transportation.] Aerospace created by
section 7 of this act.
Sec. 15. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Nevada Aerospace Development Fund created
by section 10 of this act the sum of $10,000,000.
-
*AB100_R1*

– 8 –
2. The amount appropriated by subsection 1 must be used for
the purpose of conducting a study of the development of intrastate
air service in this State and for the purpose of making grants of
money pursuant to section 11 of this act.
Sec. 16. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Fund for Aviation created by NRS 494.048, as
amended by section 14 of this act, the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,000,000
2. The money appropriated by subsection 1 must be used by
rural airports to match money that is available from the Federal
Aviation Administration.
Sec. 17. 1. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
(a) Section 9 of Article 8 of the Nevada Constitution contains a
provision commonly known as the “gift clause” which restricts the
State, under certain circumstances, from donating or loaning the
State’s money or credit to any company, association or corporation,
except corporations formed for educational or charitable purposes.
(b) In Employers Insurance Company of Nevada v. State Board
of Examiners, 117 Nev. 249, 258 (2001), the Nevada Supreme Court
held that the State loans its credit in violation of Section 9 of Article
8 of the Nevada Constitution only when the State acts as a surety or
guarantor for the debts of a company, corporation or association.
(c) In Lawrence v. Clark County, 127 Nev. 390, 405 (2011), the
Nevada Supreme Court held that the State does not donate, loan or
“gift” its money in violation of Section 9 of Article 8 of the Nevada
Constitution when the State dispenses state funds for public
purposes and the State receives a valuable benefit or fair
consideration in exchange for the dispensation of the state funds.
(d) In McLaughlin v. Housing Authority of the City of Las
Vegas, 68 Nev. 84, 93 (1951), and Lawrence v. Clark County, 127
Nev. 390, 399 (2011), the Nevada Supreme Court held that when
the Legislature authorizes a state agency to dispense state funds:
(1) The courts will carefully examine whether the Legislature
made an informed and appropriate finding that the dispensation of
the state funds serves a public purpose and the State receives a
valuable benefit or fair compensation in exchange for the
dispensation;
(2) The courts will give great weight and due deference to
the Legislature’s finding, and the courts will uphold the
Legislature’s finding unless it clearly appears to be erroneous and
without reasonable foundations; and
(3) The courts will closely examine whether the dispensing
state agency reviews all facts, figures and necessary information
-
*AB100_R1*

– 9 –
when making the dispensation, and when the state agency has done
so, it will not be second-guessed by the courts.
2. The Legislature hereby further finds and declares that:
(a) The program developed and carried into effect pursuant to
section 11 of this act will not result in the State acting as a surety or
guarantor of the debts of an air carrier receiving a grant of money.
(b) The purpose of section 11 of this act is to develop and carry
into effect a state program to encourage air carriers to resume, retain
or enhance the provision of commercial air service to and from
small hub airports, nonhub airports and large hub airports that serve
rural communities in this State.
(c) The provisions of section 11 of this act are intended to serve
an important public purpose and ensure that the State receives
valuable benefits and fair consideration in exchange for each grant
of money from the program because:
(1) The program requires the dispensing state agency to
review all facts, figures and necessary information when making
each grant of money from the program to determine whether the
grant will provide economic benefit to the State;
(2) The provision of air transportation service to and from
small hub airports and nonhub airports enables the citizens and
businesses of this State to travel more efficiently, and at lower cost,
to and from the rural communities in this State; and
(3) The dispensing state agency may not make a grant of
money from the program unless the agency receives a commitment
from the air carrier receiving the grant to commence or continue air
service to a designated small hub airport, nonhub airport or large
hub airport that services small hub airports and nonhub airports.
3. As used in this section, “air carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 18. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to an officer, agency or other entity whose
name is changed or whose responsibilities are transferred pursuant
to the provisions of this act to refer to the appropriate officer,
agency or other entity.
Sec. 19. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
-
*AB100_R1*

– 10 –
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 20. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of
sections 12 and 23 of this act, any person who, on July 1, 2025, was
appointed to serve on the Nevada Air Service Development
Commission created by NRS 231.680, as that section existed on
June 30, 2025, may continue to serve in that capacity until his or her
term would ordinarily expire pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
231.680, as that section existed on June 30, 2025.
Sec. 21. On July 1, 2025, the State Controller shall transfer
any unexpended balance in the Nevada Air Service Development
Fund created by NRS 231.690, as that section existed on June 30,
2025, to the Nevada Aerospace Development Fund created by
section 10 of this act.
Sec. 22. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 23. NRS 231.600, 231.610, 231.620, 231.630, 231.650,
231.655, 231.665, 231.680, 231.690, 231.700, 231.710, 231.720 and
231.730 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 24. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
LEADLINES OF REPEALED SECTIONS
231.600 Definitions.
231.610 “Air carrier” defined.
231.620 “Commission” defined.
231.630 “Fund” defined.
231.650 “Local air service development entity” defined.
231.655 “National Plan of Integrated Airport Systems
public airport” or “NPIAS airport” defined.
231.665 “Public use airport” defined.
-
*AB100_R1*

– 11 –
231.680 Creation; membership; terms; election of Chair,
Vice Chair and Secretary; meetings; quorum.
231.690 Nevada Air Service Development Fund: Creation;
gifts, grants and donations; interest; use.
231.700 Administration of Fund; regulations.
231.710 Grant program for air service or enhanced air
service; requirements for grant application.
231.720 Award of grants.
231.730 Annual reports to Legislature.
H
-
*AB100_R1*